Massachusetts, session 194th, S89.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Whereas, The deferred operation of this act would tend to defeat its
purpose, which is to immediately remove unnecessary burdens from vulnerable social equity
businesses before the end of the license exclusivity period, therefore it is hereby declared to be
an emergency law, necessary for the immediate preservation of the public convenience.
SECTION 2. Section 4 Chapter 94G of the General Laws is amended by inserting, at the
end of the section, the following subsection:-
(m) The commission shall not prohibit the delivery of cannabis by licensed delivery
operators or couriers to any municipality in the commonwealth nor to any establishment that
provides overnight lodging services to tourists and visitors, including but not limited to hotels,
motels, and resorts.
of 1